North Dakota, session 69, HB1262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-28-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
30.1-28-04. (5-304) Findings - Order of appointment.
1. The court shall exercise the authority conferred in this chapter consistent with the
maximum self-reliance and independence of the incapacitated person and make
appointive and other orders only to the extent necessitated by the incapacitated
person's actual mental and adaptive limitations or other conditions warranting the
procedure.
2. At a hearing held under this chapter, the court shall:
a. Hear evidence that the proposed ward is an incapacitated person. Age,
eccentricity, poverty, or medical diagnosis alone is not sufficient to justify a finding
of incapacity;
b. Hear evidence and determine whether there are any existing general durable
powers of attorney and durable powers of attorney for health care. If there are
validly executed durable powers of attorney, the court shall consider the
appointed attorneys in fact and agents appointed thereunder when assessing
alternative resource plans and the need for a guardian; and
c. Appoint a guardian, other than the proposed ward, and confer specific powers of
guardianship only after finding in the record based on clear and convincing
evidence that:
(1) The proposed ward is an incapacitated person;
Page No. 1 25.0878.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(2) There is no available alternative resource plan that is suitable to safeguard
the proposed ward's health, safety, or habilitation which could be used
instead of a guardianship;
(3) The guardianship is necessary as the best means of providing care,
supervision, or habilitation of the ward; and
(4) The powers and duties conferred upon the guardian are appropriate as the
least restrictive form of intervention consistent with the ability of the ward for
self-care.
3. Except upon specific findings of the court, a ward may not be deprived of any of the
following legal rights: to vote, to seek to change marital status, or to obtain or retain a
motor vehicle operator's license.
4. The court may find that the ward retains other specific rights.
5. The order appointing a guardian confers upon the guardian only those powers and
duties specified in the order. In addition to any other powers conferred upon the
guardian, the court's order must state whether the guardian has no authority, general
authority, or limited authority to make decisions on behalf of the ward in each of the
areas of residential, educational, medical, legal, vocational, and financial
decisionmaking. A grant of limited authority must specify the limitations upon the
authority of the guardian or the authority retained by the ward. The court's order must
require the guardian to provide within ninety days from the date of the order a
beginning inventory of all assets owned by the ward or in which the ward has an
interest. The guardian shall provide a copy of the beginning inventory to the ward and
any interested persons designated by the court in its order. Unless terminated earlier
by the court, an order appointing or reappointing a guardian under this section is
effective for up to five years. At least ninety days before the expiration of the initial
order of appointment or any following order of reappointment, the court shall request
and consider information submitted by the guardian, ward, ward's attorney, if any, and
any interested persons regarding whether the need for a guardian continues to exist. If
it is recommended that the guardianship continue, the court may appoint a guardian
ad litem or visitor, or both, in accordance with section 30.1-28-03. The court shall hold
a hearing on whether the guardianship should continue. Following the hearing and
Page No. 2 25.0878.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
consideration of submitted information, the court may reappoint the guardian for up to
another five years, allow the existing order to expire, or appoint a new guardian in
accordance with this section. The supreme court, by rule or order, shall provide for the
regular review of guardianship in existence on August 1, 2015.
6. Unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise, a durable power of
attorney for health care executed pursuant to chapter 23-06.5 takes precedence over
any authority to make medical decisions granted to a guardian pursuant to chapter
30.1-28.
7. The court may require a guardian to furnish a bond in the amount and with sureties as
the court specifies.
8. After the hearing, the guardian ad litem must be discharged of the person's duties as
guardian ad litem.
Page No. 3 25.0878.01000